California, session 20252026, SB658.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 1.6 (commencing with Section 1102.50) is added to Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code, to read: Article 1.6. Post Disaster Community Stabilization Act1102.50. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) On January 7, 2025, a state of emergency was declared in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura due to the Palisades Fires and severe windstorm conditions, which resulted in multiple additional wildfires, including the Eaton, Hurst, Lidia, Sunset, Woodley, and Hughes Fires. These wildfires devastated communities across the greater Los Angeles area, burning over 47,900 acres and destroying or damaging more than 16,250 structures, including homes, small businesses, schools, childcare facilities, and places of worship.(b) These fires have destroyed entire neighborhoods and communities, uprooting families that have called these places home for generations, destroying businesses that owners have struggled and sacrificed to build, and disrupting community ties that cannot be easily reestablished.(c) Recovery from this disaster requires more than just rebuilding homes, structures, and the physical infrastructure that has been lost, but also entails preservation of community ties and the culture that grew and flourished in neighborhoods devastated by these fires.(d) Homeowners, faith leaders, and business property owners have reported receiving unsolicited offers to purchase their property, which in many instances represent their life savings and family legacies.(e) Real estate investment firms are seeking to buy distressed properties from fire victims who are currently overwhelmed by the overlapping hardships of bureaucratic hurdles, financial burdens, and the trauma of destruction, displacement, and profound loss.(f) If land is lost to speculation, the communities harmed by these fires risk losing their unique assets and culture, which only exacerbates an already disproportionate impact on Black families who built generational wealth and created a sanctuary in Altadena after being redlined out of other parts of the region.(g) Local residents and organizations are already working to acquire and temporarily steward land until a community-driven plan is in place, offering a community-based option for those who decide to sell their property.(h) California has an interest in preventing displacement and loss of community assets and culture following a disaster, and ensuring community-based organizations have opportunities to acquire and hold property to increase access to affordable housing, homeownership opportunities, and community-serving small businesses.(i) The anticommunity displacement mechanism and protections contained in the provisions of this act are necessary to assure that communities are kept whole following catastrophic wildfires and to prevent permanent displacement of communities following these devastating events.1102.50.1102.52. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “2025 Los Angeles Fire Impact Area” means the ZIP Codes within or adjacent to the fire perimeter of the Eaton or Palisades Fires, as determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 1102.52. Protection’s disaster assessment maps.(b)“Affordable” in reference to housing cost, including in the case of resident-owned housing units, has the same meaning as in Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(c)“Affordable” in reference to rent has the same meaning as in Section 50053 of the Health and Safety Code.(d)“Area median income” has the same meaning as in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.(e)(b) “Declared disaster” or “state of emergency” includes any of the following:(1) A state of emergency or disaster declared by the federal government.(2) A state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to Section 8625 of the Government Code.(3) A local emergency proclaimed by a local governing body or official pursuant to Section 8630 of the Government Code.(f)“Fire-damaged commercial real property” means commercial real property located in the 2025 Los Angeles Fire Impact Area that was damaged or destroyed by the Eaton or Palisades Fires.(g)“Local authority” means the city that has jurisdiction of the area in which the property is located or, for an unincorporated area in which the property is located, the County of Los Angeles.(h)“Lower income households” has the same meaning as in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.(i)“Persons and families of low or moderate income” has the same meaning as in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) “Real property” means any of the following:(1) A single-family residential property.(2) A multifamily residential property.(3) A mobilehome park, as defined in Section 798.4.(4) A manufactured housing community, as defined in Section 18210.7 of the Health and Safety Code.(5) A mixed-use residential and commercial property.(6) Commercial property.(j)(d) “Qualified entity” means an organization that has provided notice to the local authority County of Los Angeles, pursuant to Section 1102.56.(k)(1)“Residential real property” means any of the following:(A)A single-family residential property that meets any of the following criteria:(i)The property is occupied by a tenant.(ii)The property was damaged or destroyed by the Eaton or Palisades Fires and was occupied by a tenant as of January 7, 2025.(iii)The property was damaged or destroyed by the Eaton or Palisades Fires and was used as the owner’s primary residence on January 7, 2025.(B)A multifamily residential property that meets either of the following criteria:(i)The property is vacant or occupied, in whole or in part, by tenants.(ii)The property was damaged or destroyed by the Eaton or Palisades Fires and was occupied by a tenant as of January 7, 2025.(C)A mobilehome park, as defined in Section 798.4.(D)A manufactured housing community, as defined in Section 18210.7 of the Health and Safety Code.(E)A mixed-used property that meets either of the following criteria:(i)The property is vacant or occupied, in whole or in part, by a tenant.(ii)The property was damaged or destroyed by the Eaton or Palisades Fires and was occupied by a tenant as of January 7, 2025.(2)“Residential real property” does not include any of the following:(A)A property that is currently subject to a regulatory agreement with a governmental agency that restricts rents to occupancy by low-income households and is being transferred to a nonprofit entity, or a limited partnership or limited liability company controlled by a nonprofit, that agrees to a condition of the sale or transfer to record a new regulatory agreement with a governmental agency that restricts occupancy to eligible low-income households for at least 30 years.(B)A property owned by a local, state, or federal government.(C)A property owned by and operated as a hospital, convent, monastery, extended care facility, or convalescent home.(D)A dormitory owned and operated by an educational institution.(E)A property owned by a corporation that is owned and controlled by a majority of residents who occupy the property and are at least 18 years of age.(l)(e) “State of emergency” has the same meaning as in Section 8558 of the Government Code.1102.52.(a)On and after the effective date of this section, and for six years following the expiration of a declared disaster or state of emergency resulting from the Eaton or Palisades Fires, an 1102.54. An owner of residential real property or fire-damaged commercial real property located within the 2025 Los Angeles Fire Impact Area shall comply with the requirements of this section before taking any of the following actions: may send the County of Los Angeles or a qualified entity a notice of the owner’s intent to sell the property.(1)Offering the residential real property or fire-damaged commercial real property for sale to any purchaser other than a qualified entity.(2)Soliciting any offer to purchase the residential real property or fire-damaged commercial real property from any purchaser other than a qualified entity.(3)Accepting any unsolicited offer to purchase residential real property or fire-damaged commercial real property from any party other than a qualified entity.(4)Entering into a contract for sale of the residential real property or fire-damaged commercial real property with any party other than a qualified entity, whether through listing or off-market sale, whether individual properties or a bundled portfolio of properties.(b)(1)An owner of real property described in subdivision (a) shall send a notice of the owner’s intent to sell the property to each qualified entity.(2)(a) The notice required by this subdivision shall described in this section may include all of the following, as applicable:(A)(1) The location and a description of the real property.(B)(2) The unit number or other designation of each rental unit of the real property.(C)(3) The number of bedrooms and bathrooms in each residential rental unit.(D)(4) For fire-damaged commercial real property, the square footage.(E)(5) The annual expenses for the real property, including, but not limited to, management, insurance, utilities, and maintenance costs.(F)(6) If the owner opted into Los Angeles County Public Works’ Government-Run Debris Removal Program, a copy of the Right of Entry form and other available documentation of cleanup.(G)(7) If the owner opted out of Los Angeles County Public Works’ Government-Run Debris Removal Program, a copy of the opt-out form and, if applicable, a copy of the Right of Entry withdrawal form.(c)(1)A qualified entity may, within 10 days of receipt of the notice required by subdivision (b), send a written notice to the property owner expressing interest in purchasing the property.(2)If the property owner does not receive a notice expressing interest in purchasing the property from any qualified entity within 10 days of the last date on which a qualified entity received notice under subdivision (b), the property owner may proceed in selling the property to another person or entity.(d)If the property owner receives a notice expressing interest in purchasing the property from a qualified entity pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), the property owner shall provide the qualified entity with a disclosure package that provides, at a minimum, all of the following information:(1)The move-in date of each tenant of the real property.(2)Base rent for each rental unit of the real property.(3)The costs that are passed through to each tenant, if any.(4)Whether each tenant has a written lease or rental agreement and the terms of those tenancies.(5)Contact information for each tenant.(6)For properties where the owner opted out of Los Angeles County Public Works’ Government-Run Debris Removal Program, a copy of the EPIC-LA Fire Debris Removal Permit, and a detailed description and substantiation of all repair, remediation, and removal activities that have occurred at the property.(e)Within 20 days of receiving the disclosure package pursuant to subdivision (d), the qualified entity shall make reasonable efforts to inform the tenants of the qualified entity’s interest in purchasing the residential real property or fire-damaged commercial real property, and request to meet and confer with the property owner to confirm their interest in purchasing the property. The property owner shall meet and confer with the qualified entity within the applicable timeframe in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) upon request. If the qualified entity does not request to meet and confer with the property owner to confirm their interest in purchasing the property within 20 days of receiving the disclosure package, the property owner may proceed in selling the property to another party.(f)(1)A qualified entity desiring to purchase real property described in subdivision (a) that consists of five or more units shall submit an offer to purchase the property so that it reaches the property owner within 60 days of the date on which the qualified entity received the disclosure package required pursuant to subdivision (d). If the property consists of four or fewer units, the qualified entity desiring to purchase the real property shall submit an offer to purchase the property so that it reaches the property owner within 40 days of the date on which the qualified entity received the disclosure package.(2)If a qualified entity submits an offer to purchase the property, it shall simultaneously give notice to each tenant that it has made an offer to purchase the property.(3)If the property owner does not receive an offer to purchase the property within the applicable timeframes in paragraph (1), the property owner may proceed in selling the property to another party.(g)(1)If the property owner accepts an offer submitted pursuant to this section, the property owner and the qualified entity shall attempt to, within 10 days of acceptance of the offer, enter into a voluntary agreement setting the timeline within which the qualified entity shall secure financing and within which both parties shall close the deal.(2)If the property owner and the qualified entity fail to enter into a voluntary agreement setting the timeline within which to secure financing and close the deal, the following timelines shall govern, unless the parties later enter into a voluntary agreement:(A)(i)If the property is a single-family residential real property, the property owner shall afford the qualified entity 30 days after the date the offer was accepted to secure financing.(ii)If, within the 30 days afforded pursuant to clause (i), the qualified entity presents the property owner with the written statement of a lending institution or agency that the institution or agency estimates that a decision with respect to financing or financial assistance will be made within 45 days after the date the offer was accepted, the property owner shall afford an extension of time consistent with the written estimate.(B)(i)If the property is a multifamily residential real property containing two to four units, the property owner shall afford the qualified entity 90 days after the date the offer was accepted to secure financing.(ii)If, within the 90 days afforded pursuant to clause (i), the qualified entity presents the property owner with the written statement of a lending institution or agency that the institution or agency estimates that a decision with respect to financing or financial assistance will be made within 120 days after the date the offer was accepted, the property owner shall afford an extension of time consistent with the written estimate.(C)(i)If the property is a multifamily residential real property containing more than four units or a fire-damaged commercial real property, the property owner shall afford the qualified entity 120 days after the date the offer was accepted to secure financing.(ii)If, within the 120 days afforded pursuant to clause (i), the qualified entity presents the property owner with the written statement of a lending institution or agency that the institution or agency estimates that a decision with respect to financing or financial assistance will be made within 160 days after the date the offer was accepted, the property owner shall afford an extension of time consistent with the written estimate.(3)If the qualified entity does not secure financing within the timeframe agreed upon pursuant to a voluntary agreement, or within the applicable timeframes in paragraph (2) in the absence of a voluntary agreement, the property owner may proceed in selling the property to another party.(h)(1)A property owner may reject any offer submitted to purchase real property pursuant to this section.(2)If the property owner rejects an offer from a qualified entity submitted pursuant to subdivision (f), the property owner may sell the property to any other party subject to paragraph (3).(3)If the party from whom the property owner intends to accept an offer is not a qualified entity, the property owner shall do both of the following:(A)Notify the qualified entity that submitted a rejected offer that the property owner intends to accept an offer from a party that is not a qualified entity.(B)Provide the qualified entity that submitted a rejected offer with 10 days to invoke a right of first refusal to match the price of the offer on the same terms as that offer. The qualified entity may invoke its right of first refusal by submitting a notice that reaches the property owner within 10 days of the date on which the qualified entity received the notice described in subparagraph (A).(4)If a qualified entity does not receive the notice required by subdivision (b) and the property owner accepts an offer from a party that is not a qualified entity, the qualified entity shall be given 80 days to invoke a right of first refusal to match the price of the offer on the same terms as that offer. The qualified entity may invoke its right of first refusal by submitting a notice that reaches the property owner within 80 days of the date on which the property owner accepted the offer submitted by the party that is not a qualified entity.(i)Notices and the disclosure package required pursuant to this section shall be delivered by certified mail and additionally by email if email addresses are available.(j)(1)The Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall provide the local authority with data describing the fire perimeter sufficient for the local authority to determine which ZIP Codes are in the 2025 Los Angeles Fire Impact Area.(2)Following the receipt of the data in paragraph (1), the local authority shall issue a bulletin to inform property owners which ZIP Codes are in the 2025 Los Angeles Fire Impact Area.(k)This section shall not apply to the following transfers of real property:(1)An inter vivos transfer, whether or not for consideration, between any of the following:(A)Spouses.(B)Domestic partners.(C)A parent and child.(D)Siblings.(E)A sibling of a parent and a child of that parent.(F)A grandparent and grandchild.(2)A transfer for consideration by a decedent’s estate to members of the decedent’s family if the consideration arising from the transfer will pass from the decedent’s estate to, or solely for the benefit of, a charity. For purposes of this paragraph, “members of the decedent’s family” includes all of the following:(A)A spouse, domestic partner, parent, child, grandparent, or grandchild.(B)A trust for the primary benefit of a spouse, domestic partner, parent, child, grandparent, or grandchild.(3)A transfer of bare legal title into a revocable trust, without actual consideration for the transfer, where the transferor is the current beneficiary of the trust.(4)A transfer to a named beneficiary of a revocable trust by reason of the death of the grantor of the revocable trust.(5)A transfer pursuant to court order or court-approved settlement.(6)A transfer by eminent domain or under threat of eminent domain.1102.54.(a)For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1)“Qualified owner-occupied single-family property” means a single-family residential property that was damaged or destroyed by the Eaton or Palisades Fires and was used as the owner’s primary residence on January 7, 2025.(2)“Qualified purchaser” means a person or family of low or moderate income or a cooperative corporation dedicated to affordable housing.(3)“Qualified tenant-occupied property” means any of the following real property that is currently occupied by a tenant or was occupied by a tenant as of January 7, 2025, and is located in the 2025 Los Angeles Fire Impact Area:(A)Mixed-use property.(B)Multifamily residential real property.(C)Single-family residential property.(b)A qualified entity that acquires qualified tenant-occupied property pursuant to Section 1102.52, as well as all successive owners, shall be subject to all of the following:(1)(A)(i)All existing tenancies of the qualified tenant-occupied property shall be retained on the same terms that were in effect before the acquisition, except as permitted by state and local law.(ii)The qualified entity shall offer to restore, on the same terms that were in effect on January 7, 2025, the tenancy of a former tenant of the qualified tenant-occupied property if the tenancy existed on January 7, 2025, and was terminated on or after January 7, 2025, due to damage to or destruction of the property caused by the Eaton or Palisades Fires. All tenancies restored pursuant to this clause shall be retained on those same terms, except as permitted by state and local law.(iii)An existing or restored tenancy described in clause (i) or (ii) shall not be terminated for failure to meet income restrictions imposed by this section.(2)(A)Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the qualified entity shall ensure that vacant units of the qualified tenant-occupied property are filled with persons and families of low or moderate income, and that the housing cost or rent for those units is affordable to persons and families of low or moderate income.(B)If the average rental rate or housing cost of the units of a qualified tenant-occupied property exceeds that which is affordable to lower income households, the qualified entity shall make vacant units available at a rent or housing cost that is affordable to persons and families whose incomes do not exceed 60 percent of the area median income until the average rental rate is no greater than that which is affordable to lower income households.(3)Once acquired by a qualified entity, the qualified tenant-occupied property shall not be sold except to a qualified purchaser and for not more than an affordable housing cost. Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, a qualified entity may sell the dwelling units of a qualified tenant-occupied property to a qualified purchaser if the mortgage and property tax payments anticipated to be paid by the qualified purchaser do not exceed an affordable housing cost.(c)(1)A qualified entity that acquires fire-damaged commercial real property or qualified owner-occupied single-family property, as well as all successive owners, shall adhere to the community rebuilding and disposition guidelines developed pursuant to paragraph (2) for any new development or disposition of the property.(2)(A)On or before July 1, 2026, the local authorities shall jointly convene a working group consisting of individuals and organizations representing individuals who were impacted by the Eaton or Palisades Fires, including, but not limited to, homeowners, renters, business owners, displaced workers, community land trusts, mutual aid organizations, and organizations with a primary purpose of supporting affordable homeownership, rental housing, and small business development, to provide input to the local authorities on the development of community rebuilding and disposition guidelines that, upon adoption by the city or county, shall govern new development or disposition of any fire-damaged commercial real property or qualified owner-occupied single-family property that was acquired by a qualified entity.(B)The working group in subparagraph (A) may provide input on independent guidelines for the Eaton and Palisades Fires.1102.56. (a) The local authority County of Los Angeles shall develop a process by which any of the organizations described in subdivision (b) may notify the local authority county of their interest in purchasing residential real property or fire-damaged commercial real property pursuant to this article.(b) The following types of organizations may submit a notification to the local authority pursuant to subdivision (a):(1) A local public entity, as defined in Section 50079 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) A nonprofit corporation with all of the following attributes:(A) It has a determination letter from the Internal Revenue Service affirming its tax-exempt status pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is not a private foundation as that term is defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code.(B) It has its principal place of business in California.(C) The primary residences of all board members are located in California.(D) One of its primary activities is the development and preservation of affordable rental housing or affordable homeownership opportunities in California, if the organization acquires residential real property, or the development and preservation of small businesses in California if the organization acquires fire-damaged commercial real property.(E) It is registered and in good standing with the Attorney General’s Registry of Charitable Trusts, pursuant to the Supervision of Trustees and Fundraisers for Charitable Purposes Act (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12580) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).(3) A limited partnership in which the managing general partner is a nonprofit corporation meeting all of the requirements of paragraph (2).(4) A limited liability company wholly owned by a community land trust or by one or more nonprofit corporations meeting all of the requirements of paragraph (2).(5) A community land trust, as defined in clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 402.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.(c) The local authority County of Los Angeles shall maintain on its internet website an up-to-date listing of all organizations that have submitted a notification to the local authority pursuant to subdivision (a) on its internet website. (a).1102.58.(a)An owner that sells a residential real property or fire-damaged commercial real property shall record, or cause to be recorded, a certification of compliance under penalty of perjury at the time of sale, that one of the following applies:(1)The owner has complied with the requirements of this article. The owner shall attach to the certificate of compliance a copy of the notice that the owner sent pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 1102.52 to the organizations that have provided notice to the local authority pursuant to Section 1102.56.(2)The owner or transaction is exempt from the requirements of this article pursuant to Section 1102.52.(b)(1)A certification of compliance recorded pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include the address of the relevant property.(2)(A)Failure to file the certification of compliance shall be an infraction punishable in accordance with the fine schedule established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 36900 of the Government Code. Willful or knowing failure to file the certification of compliance shall be punishable by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per unit of the residential real property for each day of noncompliance.(B)Fines under subparagraph (A) shall be paid following notice and an opportunity for hearing to the local authority in whose jurisdiction the property is located.(c)The affordability requirements in subdivision (b) of Section 1102.54 shall be contained in a covenant or restriction recorded against the property at the time of sale, which shall run with the land and shall be enforceable, against any owner who violates a covenant or restriction and each successor in interest who continues the violation, by any of the following:(1)A resident of a unit subject to this article.(2)A residents’ association with members who reside in units subject to this article.(3)A former resident of a unit subject to this article who last resided in that unit.(4)An applicant seeking to enforce the covenants or restrictions for a particular unit that is subject to this article, if the applicant meets all of the following criteria:(A)Is a person or family of low or moderate income.(B)Is able and willing to occupy that particular unit.(C)Was denied occupancy of that particular unit due to an alleged breach of a covenant or restriction implementing this article.(D)Is on an affordable housing waiting list.(5)The Attorney General.(6)The local authority.(7)An organization that has provided notice to the local authority pursuant to Section 1102.56.(d)(1)Any party listed in subdivision (c) may seek enforcement of any right or provision under this article in the superior court and, upon prevailing, shall be entitled to the following remedies:(A)Actual damages. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the amount of damages for a violation of Section 1102.52 is equal to the difference between the price of the property at the time of sale in violation of this article and the price for which the qualified entity could purchase the property pursuant to this article at the time that damages are awarded.(B)If the owner willfully or knowingly sells the property without complying with this article, the court shall impose additional damages in an amount proportional to the culpability of the owner and the value of the property. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that the amount is equal to 10 percent of the sale price for a first violation, 20 percent for a second violation, and 30 percent for each subsequent violation.(C)Costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees.(2)In addition to any other remedy available under this article or any other law, the superior court may enjoin a sale or other action taken by the owner of the property in violation of this article.1102.60.(a)For purposes of this section, “stronger right to purchase” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:(1)Additional eligible qualified entities, including, but not limited to, the tenants or residents of a property or an organization consisting of tenants or residents of a property.(2)A longer period of time for a qualified entity, including an organization of tenants or residents, to make or consider an offer, to secure financing, or to otherwise close the deal on purchasing the property.(3)A longer term of affordability restrictions on the property and longer terms of tenancy for existing or future tenants.(b)Except as provided in subdivision (c), this article shall not preempt or invalidate a local ordinance, regulation, or other policy that provides a qualified entity with a right of first offer, right of first refusal, or other opportunity to purchase property.(c)If a local ordinance, regulation, or other policy conflicts with this article, the provision that provides the qualified entity with a stronger right to purchase the property shall prevail.1102.61. The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.1102.58. This article shall be repealed six years following the expiration of the last declared disaster or state of emergency resulting from the Eaton or Palisades Fire.SEC. 2.Section 2923.56 is added to the Civil Code, to read:2923.56. On and after the effective date of this section, and for six years following the end of a declared disaster or state of emergency resulting from the Eaton or Palisades Fires, a mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, or authorized agent shall do both of the following within three business days of recording a notice of default against any fire-damaged commercial real property, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 1102.50, or any multifamily residential property meeting the criteria in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 1102.50 and located within the 2025 Los Angeles Fire Impact Area, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1102.50:(a)Provide the mortgagor or trustor with a list of the qualified entities that have provided notice to the local authority pursuant to Section 1102.56 of their interest in purchasing property subject to Article 1.6 (commencing with Section 1102.50) of Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2.(b)Post a copy of the notice of default in a conspicuous place on the property. However, if access to the property is denied because a common entrance to the property is restricted by a guard gate or similar impediment, the notice may be posted at that guard gate or similar impediment.SEC. 3.(a)The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1)On January 7, 2025, a state of emergency was declared in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura due to the Palisades Fires and severe windstorm conditions, which resulted in multiple additional wildfires, including the Eaton, Hurst, Lidia, Sunset, Woodley, and Hughes Fires. These wildfires devastated communities across the greater Los Angeles area, burning over 47,900 acres and destroying or damaging more than 16,250 structures, including homes, small businesses, schools, childcare facilities, and places of worship.(2)These fires have destroyed entire neighborhoods and communities, uprooting families that have called these places home for generations, destroying businesses that owners have struggled and sacrificed to build, and disrupting community ties that cannot be easily reestablished.(3)Recovery from this disaster requires more than just rebuilding homes, structures, and the physical infrastructure that has been lost, but also entails preservation of community ties and the culture that grew and flourished in neighborhoods devastated by these fires.(4)Homeowners, faith leaders, and business property owners have reported receiving unsolicited offers to purchase their property, which in many instances represent their life savings and family legacies.(5)Real estate investment firms are seeking to buy distressed properties from fire victims who are currently overwhelmed by the overlapping hardships of bureaucratic hurdles, financial burdens, and the trauma of destruction, displacement, and profound loss.(6)If land is lost to speculation, the communities harmed by these fires risk losing their unique assets and culture, which only exacerbates an already disproportionate impact on Black families who built generational wealth and created a sanctuary in Altadena after being redlined out of other parts of the region.(7)Local residents and organizations are already working to acquire and temporarily steward land until a community-driven plan is in place, offering a community-based option for those who decide to sell their property.(8)Preventing displacement and loss of community assets and culture following a disaster is a matter of statewide concern. Moreover, California has an interest in ensuring community-based organizations have opportunities to acquire and hold property to increase access to affordable housing, homeownership opportunities, and community-serving small businesses.(9)The anti-community displacement mechanism and protections contained in the provisions of this act are necessary to assure that communities are kept whole following catastrophic wildfires and to prevent permanent displacement of communities following these devastating events.(10)It is for these reasons that it is of statewide importance that those anti-community displacement mechanisms and protections are enacted.(11)As wildfire seasons have become more devastating and their threat looms over the entirety of the state, it is critical that all local jurisdictions, including charter cities, have these same protections apply to them.(b)Therefore, the Legislature finds and declares that the provision of adequate housing, in light of the severe shortage of housing at all income levels in the state, is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act adding Article 1.6 (commencing with Section 1102.50) to Chapter 2 of Title 4 of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Civil Code and Section 2 of this act adding Section 2923.56 to the Civil Code apply to all cities, including charter cities.SEC. 4.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the need to prevent displacement and promote community stewardship of land in the communities that faced widespread destruction from the Palisades Fire, Eaton Fire, and windstorm conditions.SEC. 5.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution for certain costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district because, in that regard, this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.